Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 5. Finance

§ 23-1-501.
Game and fish fund.

The Wyoming game and fish fund is continued in existence.

All revenue received by the commission or department shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the Wyoming game and fish fund. Monies in the fund designated by the commission for investment in the Pool A investment account shall be invested pursuant to W.S. 9-4-715(p). The commission may establish accounts within the fund to carry out the purposes of this act, in addition to those accounts established by law. The Wyoming game and fish fund shall be expended as the commission may direct to carry out the purposes of this act and for no other purpose, except that the legislature may appropriate so much thereof as necessary for expenses of any authorized legislative committee to study matters relating to the commission or department. Expenditures from the Wyoming game and fish fund shall be made only by warrant issued by the state auditor upon vouchers signed by the director and chief fiscal officer, or other persons designated by the commission to sign in their absence, substantiated and approved as provided by law.

An account within the Wyoming game and fish fund is created. Revenues collected from the sale of licenses under W.S. 23-2-101(j)(vii), (viii) and (xlvi) and 23-2-201(d)(viii) shall be deposited within the account. The commission may annually transfer into the fund from the account an amount not to exceed six percent (6%) of the total account balance.

A trust account within the Wyoming game and fish fund is created. Gifts accepted by the commission as provided under W.S. 23-1-302(a)(xxviii) shall be deposited within the account. The commission shall maintain a public record of each donor and the amount of the gift. The commission may make expenditures from the account for any purpose for which the commission is authorized by law to expend funds, subject to any restrictions or conditions placed on the gift by the donor. The commission shall maintain a public record of the amount of each expenditure from the account and the purpose for the expenditure.

An account within the game and fish fund is created. Revenues collected under W.S. 23-2-101(n), 23-2-201(e) and as specified under W.S. 23-2-306(a) and (b) shall be deposited within the account. The commission shall use revenues in the account to purchase access easements to provide access to public and private lands. The commission shall notify in writing the appropriate boards of county commissioners before purchasing any access easements under this subsection. In addition and on or before February 1 of each year, the commission shall annually report to the legislature on easements purchased pursuant to this subsection during the preceding fiscal year.

A trust account separate and apart from the trust account established under subsection (d) of this section is created within the Wyoming game and fish fund. The account shall consist of those funds appropriated or designated to the account by law or by gift from whatever source. Funds deposited within the account are intended to be inviolate and constitute a permanent or perpetual trust account which shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized by law and in a manner to obtain the highest net return possible consistent with preservation of the account corpus. Earnings from investment of the account corpus shall be credited by the state treasurer into the Wyoming game and fish fund to be expended by the commission for purposes specified under subsection (b) of this section.

An account within the game and fish fund is created. Revenues received pursuant to W.S.

23-4-204

shall be credited to the account and are continuously appropriated to the commission to be expended for the prevention, surveillance, containment and direct and indirect costs associated with the administration of the aquatic invasive species program created under chapter 4, article 2 of this act.

An account within the game and fish fund is created. The portion of the revenues collected as specified under W.S. 23-2-306(e) shall be deposited into the account. Revenues deposited in the account created under this subsection are continuously appropriated to the commission and all earnings on funds in the account shall remain in the account. The commission shall use revenues in the account only as specified in this subsection and subject to the following requirements:

Of the revenues collected, not less than eighty-five percent (85%) shall be used by the commission to purchase access easements or other agreements to provide public access to private, federal and state lands that are difficult to access or inaccessible by the public for hunting and fishing purposes. The commission shall notify the appropriate boards of county commissioners in writing before purchasing any access easements or entering into any agreements under this paragraph and shall hold public hearings at the request of any board of county commissions;

Of the revenues collected, not greater than fifteen percent (15%) shall be used to provide for wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system, including signage, wildlife corridors, wildlife crossings, fish passages and game fences;

As part of the annual report required under subsection (e) of this section, the commission shall report to the legislature on all expenditures pursuant to this subsection during the preceding fiscal year.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 26; C.S. 1945, § 47-126; Laws 1955, ch. 57, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-25; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-18; 1996, ch. 121, § 2; 1999, ch. 26, § 1; ch. 92, § 1; ch. 120, § 1; 2000, ch. 63, § 1; 2003, ch. 114, § 1; ch. 143, § 1; ch. 195, § 1; 2004, ch. 30, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2; 2010, ch. 98, § 2; 2015 ch. 27, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2021 ch. 73, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 9, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2003 amendments. —

The 2003 amendment by ch. 114, § 1, effective January 1, 2004, inserted “and (viii)” in (c).

The 2003 amendment by ch. 195, § 1, effective January 1, 2004, substituted “23-2-306(a) and (b)” for “W.S. 23-2-306(a)” in (e).

While neither of the amendments gave effect to the others, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2004 amendment,

effective January 1, 2005, substituted “W.S. 23-2-101(n)” for “W.S. 23-2-101(m)” in (e).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e)” for “W.S.

9-4-711

” in (f).

The 2010 amendment,

added (g).

Laws 2010, ch. 98 § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2010.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, in (c), substituted “W.S. 23-2-101(j)(vii), (viii) and (xlvi)” for “W.S. 23-2-101(j)(vii) and (viii)” in the first sentence.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 73, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, added (h).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, in the third sentence of (f), substituted “by law” for “under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e),” added “net” following “highest” and substituted “earnings” for “interest earned” in the fourth sentence.

The third 2021 amendment, by ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, in the last sentence of (f), substituted “Earnings” for “Any interest earned.”

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (b), substituted “revenue” for “income” in the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 30, § 2, authorizes the game and fish commission to adopt rules and regulations implementing the provisions of the act upon the effective date of this section.

Laws 2004, ch. 30, § 3(a) makes this section effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b), see § 23-1-102(a)(xiii).

§ 23-1-502.
Financial policy; budget; fiscal year; debts.

The commission shall govern its financial policies, subject to the written approval of its budgets by the governor and legislative review of its budgets as provided in W.S. 9-2-1011(d). The commission shall fix the budgets for the operation and maintenance of the department and its divisions for each fiscal year at its first stated meeting of each fiscal year, and shall submit its budget estimates for the following fiscal year as provided by W.S.

9-2-1012

.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 3.

The commission shall not contract any debt, debts, or obligations in excess of twenty percent (20%) of its anticipated revenue for the ensuing year. Any debt created by the commission shall only be paid from the game and fish fund and shall be paid in full within two (2) years from the date it is contracted.

and (e) Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 54, § 2.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 27; C.S. 1945, § 47-127; Laws 1946, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 5; 1953, ch. 69, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 23-26, 23-27; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-19; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 2008, ch. 11, § 1; 2009, ch. 90, § 3; 2013 ch. 58, § 1, effective February 15, 2013; 2014 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2018 ch. 54, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted the exception at the beginning of (a); and added (d).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed former (b).

The 2013 amendment,

added “and legislative review of its budgets as provided in W.S. 9-2-1011(d)” following “the governor” in (a).

Laws 2013, ch. 28, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 15, 2013.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (d), inserted “and grizzly bear management program” following “nongame programs” in first sentence, substituted “such purposes for “such management” in the second sentence, and “managing these programs” for “managing for sensitive species and nongame programs” in the third sentence; and added (e).

The first 2018 amendment,
by ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, in (a), deleted “Except
as provided in subsection (d) of this section” from the beginning
of the first sentence.

The second
2018 amendment, by ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, in (a),
deleted “Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section”
from the beginning of the first sentence.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4 provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law.
The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts.
Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

§ 23-1-503.
Annual reports.

The commission shall submit an annual report of its official transactions and audit reports, and the conditions of Wyoming wildlife in accordance with W.S.

9-2-1014

.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 18; C.S. 1945, § 47-118; W.S. 1957, § 23-21; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-20; Laws 1974, ch. 16, §§ 2, 3.

§ 23-1-504.
Free and reduced price license revenue recoupment program.

Not later than July 31, 2007, and not later than July 31 of each subsequent year thereafter, the chief fiscal officer of the game and fish department shall prepare and certify a report of licenses sold or issued in the previous calendar year under the following statutes:

W.S. 23-2-201(f) and (g);

W.S. 23-2-101(j)(xi), (xvi), (xvii), (xx), (xxi), (xxxii), (xxxiii), (xliv) and (xlv);

W.S. 23-2-301(c)(xiii);

W.S. 23-1-705(a), (d), (e) and (h);

W.S. 23-2-207(a); and

W.S. 23-1-302(q).

The chief fiscal officer of the game and fish department shall submit to the state auditor the report created under subsection (a) of this section with a payment request for the number of licenses of each type sold or issued multiplied by the difference between the amount received by the department for that license and the cost of a full price adult license corresponding with each type of license sold or issued.

Upon receipt of the report and payment request, the state auditor shall transfer to the game and fish fund the amount claimed on the payment request from funds appropriated for this program to the extent available.

The game and fish commission shall prepare a biennial budget request prior to each budget session of the legislature for the purpose of funding the free and reduced price license revenue recoupment program and shall submit the request to the governor pursuant to W.S.

9-2-1010

through

9-2-1013

.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 180, § 1; 2010, ch. 45, § 1; 2015, ch. 130, § 1; 2015 ch. 130, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 131, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010,
in (a)(ii), inserted “(xliv) and (xlv),” and made related changes.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, in (a)(iv), inserted “and (h)” and made a related change.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (a)(vi) and made related changes.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 180, § 2, provides:

“There is appropriated to the state auditor one million one hundredthousand dollars ($1,100,000.00) from the general fund for the periodbeginning July 1, 2007 and ending June 30, 2008. Funds appropriatedunder this section shall only be expended for the purpose of fundingthe free and reduced price license revenue recoupment program andshall not be expended for any other purpose.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 180, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.